District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

36-302.21

Security requirements for retail service stations.

Recodified as § 36-301.21.

Apr. 19, 1977 D.C. Law 1-123, § 3-121
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-65, § 2, 56 DCR 6606

History